src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-kiqdarah_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:   ../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  V - kiʼdaraha-ki:
# Chapman, 1991: 24
!!!correr 	kiʼdaraha-ki 	"correr"
    kiʼdaraha+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: ʼokiʼdarahana #ʼo-kiʼdaraha-na # “I run”
    kiʼdaraha+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: ʼikiʼdarahani #	ʼi-kiʼdaraha-ni # “you run” 
    kiʼdaraha+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3M: kiʼdarahana #	kiʼdaraha-na  # “he runs”
    kiʼdaraha+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3F: kiʼdarahani # 	kiʼdaraha-ni  # “she runs”
    kiʼdaraha+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: ʼakiʼdarahana #	ʼa-kiʼdaraha-na # “we run”
    kiʼdaraha+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: ʼavakiʼdarahani #	ʼava-kiʼdaraha-ni # “you run”
    kiʼdaraha+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: vakiʼdarahana # va-kiʼdaraha-na # “they run”

    joiki+V+Hor+ScPl1: ʼajoiva # ʼa-joi-va — “Let’s go back.”
